Utah statutes.
73-5-7.   Inspection of ditches and diverting works by engineer.

The state engineer shall have authority to examine and inspect any ditch or other diverting works, and at the time of such inspection he may order the owners thereof to make any addition or alteration which he considers necessary for the security of such works, the safety of persons, or the protection of property. If any person, firm, copartnership, association or corporation refuses or neglects to comply with such requirements of the state engineer, he may bring action in the name of the state in the district court to enforce his order.



No Change Since 1953

